Nevada, session 83, SB101.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 503.050 is hereby amended to read as follows:
503.050 1. It is unlawful for any person to cause through
carelessness, neglect or otherwise any edible portion of any game
bird, game mammal, including, without limitation, a big game
mammal, game fish or game amphibian to go to waste needlessly.
2. It is unlawful for any person to capture or destroy any game
mammal, [except a carnivore,] including, without limitation, a big
game mammal, and detach or remove from the carcass the head,
hide, antlers, horns or tusks only and leave the carcass to waste.
3. [For the purposes of subsection 1, “game] As used in this
section:
(a) “Big game mammal” means any:
(1) Pronghorn antelope, black bear, mule deer, mountain
goat, mountain lion, moose or Rocky Mountain elk; or
(2) Of the following subspecies of bighorn sheep:
(I) Nelson bighorn sheep;
(II) California bighorn sheep; or
(III) Rocky Mountain bighorn sheep.
(b) “Game bird” does not include a raven, crow or magpie even
if classified as a game bird pursuant to NRS 501.110.
Sec. 2. The Board of Wildlife Commissioners shall, on or
before July 1, 2026, adopt such regulations as are necessary to carry
out the provisions of NRS 503.050, as amended by section 1 of this
act.
H
-
*SB101_R1*